Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 2. Insurance Plans
§ 9-3-210.
Amount of state's contribution; estimates submitted to state budget officer; specified employees participation in federal program; participating employers contributions.

Except for voluntary participating employers, the state shall contribute monthly the amount established and appropriated by the legislature for each employee and official enrolled in the plan in accordance with subsections (b) and (c) of this section.

Any state agency, department or institution, including the University of Wyoming and the community colleges in the state, shall pay monthly to the department the amount established and appropriated by the legislature for each eligible employee or official electing to become covered by any portion of the group insurance plan as the contribution of the state to that plan during the period the employee or official is enrolled in the plan. Amounts appropriated by the legislature from the general fund for University of Wyoming and community college employer contributions under this section shall include amounts necessary to fully fund the employer’s contribution for those eligible and enrolled employees whose compensation is partially or fully funded from nonfederal sources, but the University of Wyoming shall exclude amounts necessary to fully fund the employer’s contribution for those eligible and enrolled employees whose compensation is partially or fully funded from contracts, grants and auxiliary services. If federal funds are not available, the amounts necessary to fully fund the employer’s contribution for those eligible and enrolled employees shall be included in the general fund appropriation. If the monthly premium for coverage of the employee or official is less than the amount established and appropriated by the legislature, the balance may be applied to the premium for coverage of dependents, or to the premium for any optional group insurance coverage made available by the department, if so elected.

Each state agency, department or institution, including the University of Wyoming and the community colleges in the state shall estimate the amount required for its participation in the group insurance plan for the next biennium and shall submit the estimate to the state budget officer at the time the state budget officer makes the request.

Notwithstanding any other provision contained in W.S.

9-3-201

or the State Employees’ and Officials’ Group Insurance Act, employees of the agricultural extension service of the University of Wyoming who hold federal civil service appointments and are required to participate in federal civil service retirement may elect to participate in the federal employees’ health insurance program. For eligible employees participating in the federal employees’ health insurance program the state shall contribute monthly an amount toward the federal employees health insurance program costs which is in excess of the federal contribution thereto but which does not exceed the amount which would otherwise be paid under subsection (a) of this section if the employee were enrolled in the state group insurance plan.

A participating school district shall pay to the department the monthly premium established by the department for coverage of each eligible employee or official of that district electing to become covered by any portion of the group insurance plan. Monthly premiums shall be at minimum no less than rates assessed for coverage of other enrollees qualified under W.S. 9-3-203(a)(iv), and shall be based upon information reported by the participating district to the department, to be in a form and manner prescribed by the department.

A participating board of cooperative educational services shall pay to the department the monthly premium established by the department for coverage of each eligible employee of the employer electing to become covered by any portion of the group insurance plan. Additionally, each participating board of cooperative educational services shall pay to the department a monthly amount equal to the lowest premium for nonsupplemental coverage for each eligible employee of the employer not electing to become covered under the nonsupplemental portion of the group insurance plan. For purposes of this subsection an employee shall not be considered as not electing coverage if that employee is covered by other insurance with benefits comparable to or greater than the coverage provided by the least expensive non-supplemental plan available under this act. Monthly premiums shall be at minimum no less than rates assessed for coverage of other enrollees qualified under W.S. 9-3-203(a)(iv), and shall be based upon information reported by the participating board of cooperative educational services to the department, to be in a form and manner prescribed by the department.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 243, §§ 9, 10; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-708, 9-709; Laws 1971, ch. 219, §§ 4 to 6; 1975, ch. 202, §§ 2, 3; 1977, ch. 183, § 2; W.S. 1977, §§

9-13-109

, 9-13-110; Laws 1980, ch. 73, § 200; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; ch. 66, § 200; 1984, ch. 64, § 200; 1987, ch. 194, § 1; 1991, ch. 223, § 1; 1994, ch. 59, § 1; 2001, ch. 55, § 2; ch. 171, § 1; 2007, ch. 3, § 1; 2010, ch. 106, § 1; 2014 ch. 17, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Cross references. —

For meaning of “department,” see § 9-3-203(a)(xi).

The 2007 amendment,

effective January 1, 2008, inserted the second sentence in (b).

The 2010 amendment,

in (a), added “Except for participating school districts”; and added (e).

Laws 2010, ch. 106, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2010.

The 2014 amendment,

substituted “for voluntary participating employers” for “for participating school districts” in (a) and added (f).

Purpose of act. —

Laws 2001, ch. 171, § 2, provides that the intent of the act is to extend the effectiveness of § 9-3-210(d), which permits all university extension service employees who hold federal civil service appointments and are required to participate in the federal civil service retirement program to continue to elect to participate in the federal employees' health insurance program.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 306, effective July 1, 2004, appropriates from the general fund to the state auditor $16,600,000 for the purpose of paying the state's contribution to the state health insurance plans under W.S.

9-3-210

for each qualifying executive, judicial and legislative branch employee including employees of the University of Wyoming and the community colleges as specified in the act, and $21,018,346 to be expended for salary adjustments for executive branch employees as specified. Section 306 further provides that, notwithstanding W.S.

9-2-1008

, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207(a), any unobligated monies appropriated from the general fund to the state auditor in 2003 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 131, Section 4, Section 303 for purposes of employee salaries and benefits, shall not revert on June 30, 2004, and are hereby appropriated to the state auditor for the period beginning July 1, 2004 and ending June 30, 2006 for the purposes of employee salaries and benefits provided in Section 306 of this act.

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 311(a), makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.

§ 9-3-211.
Deductions from salaries of monthly contributions by employees and officials; establishment of procedure.

The amount of monthly contribution to be made by eligible employees and officials enrolled in the group insurance plan for themselves and their dependents shall be deducted from the monthly salaries of the employees and officials by the various agencies or voluntary participating employers and remitted to the department. The procedure for deductions and remittances shall be established by the department. If a flexible benefits plan is chosen, the employees’ and officials’ contribution shall be applied to the chosen benefits in an amount determined by the employee or official.

The department shall establish procedures for deducting and remitting monthly contributions by eligible retirees enrolled in the group insurance plan which may include deductions from the retiree’s state retirement benefits or from the retiree’s checking or savings account.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the State Employees’ and Officials’ Group Insurance Act and for the contributions provided by W.S. 9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)(IV), the contributions required by subsection (a) of this section may be paid by the Wyoming livestock board for state employee members in order to be treated as employer contributions for the sole purpose of determining tax treatment under the United States Internal Revenue Code, section 414(h). The amounts shall be stated in the employment contract.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 243, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 9-710; W.S. 1977, § 9-13-111; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 194, § 1; 1990, ch. 14, § 1; 2001, ch. 55, § 2; ch. 102, § 2; 2007, ch. 205, § 1; 2010, ch. 106, § 1; 2014 ch. 17, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (c).

The 2010 amendment,

in (a), inserted “or participating school districts.”

Laws 2010, ch. 106, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2010.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in the first sentence of (a), substituted “voluntary participating employers” for “participating school districts.”

The 2021 amendment

substituted "9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)(IV)" for "9-2-1022(a)(xi)(F)(IV)" in the first sentence of (c).

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

§ 9-3-212.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 194, § 2.

Cross references. —

For present provisions relating to administration and management of group insurance program, see §

9-3-205

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1967, ch. 243, § 12, related to assistance provided by the state insurance department.

§ 9-3-213.
Treasurer of monies; bond; deposit in an account of premium cost payments, dividend payments and return of premiums; expenditures; investment of excess portions.

The state treasurer shall be the treasurer of monies under this act, and his general bond to the state of Wyoming shall cover all liabilities for his acts as treasurer. The department shall remit to the treasurer for deposit into a separate account all payments received by the department for the group insurance premium costs from employees and officials, and the state agencies, departments, institutions and voluntary participating employers. The department shall also remit to the treasurer for deposit into the account any dividend payments and return of premium received by the department from any carrier underwriting the group insurance plan. All remittances shall be made as soon as possible after they are received.

Expenditures shall be made from the account, upon certification of the department to the office of the state auditor, only for the following purposes:

The payment of premiums to any carrier underwriting the group insurance or supplemental plan or plans; and

The state’s cost of administering group insurance and supplemental plans, subject to annual appropriation by the legislature based on the submission by the department of a budget request containing detailed information on current and projected administrative costs.

The department shall certify in writing to the state treasurer for investment portions of the monies which in its judgment will not be needed for the payment of premiums to the carriers underwriting the group insurance or supplemental plans.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 243, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 9-712; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 9-13-113; Laws 1981, ch. 111, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 194, § 1; 2001, ch. 55, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2010, ch. 106, § 1; 2014 ch. 17, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a) and (b), substituted “account” or “separate account” for “trust and agency fund,” and made stylistic changes.

The 2010 amendment,

in (a), inserted “and participating school districts,” and made related changes.

Laws 2010, ch. 106, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2010.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (a), substituted “voluntary participating employers” for “participating school districts.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-3-203(a)(xiv).

Appropriations. —

Laws 2010, ch. 106, § 3, provides: “For the period beginning on the effective date of this section and ending June 30, 2012, up to one million one hundred sixty-five thousand dollars ($1,165,000.00) is appropriated from the separate employee health insurance account established under W.S. 9-3-213(a) to the department of administration and information to implement and administer this act.
From the appropriation under this section, the department is authorized up to fifteen (15) full-time permanent positions if those positions are necessary to administer this act and the positions are authorized to be filled by the governor.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§§ 9-3-214 through 9-3-216.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 194, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to group prepaid plans, see §§

9-3-201

through

9-3-213

.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 78, § 1, related to the state employees' and officials' group life insurance program.

§ 9-3-217.
Advisory panel; composition; compensation.

The director of the department shall establish an advisory panel consisting of active plan participants employed by the state, participating school districts, the University of Wyoming and Wyoming community colleges and of retired employees who are plan participants. The panel shall consist of no more than ten (10) members if there are less than five (5) participating school districts or no more than twelve (12) members if there are at least five (5) participating school districts and, insofar as possible, shall proportionally represent the specified employee groups participating in the group health insurance plan. The advisory panel shall be consulted regarding plan benefits and costs. The director of the department shall, upon receiving notification from at least five (5) school districts electing group insurance plan participation under W.S. 9-3-201(e), appoint two (2) additional advisory panel members to increase the advisory panel to twelve (12) members as provided in this section.

State, participating school district, university and community college employee members of the panel shall suffer no loss of wages for the time devoted to attending meetings of the panel called by the department. All members shall be provided per diem and travel expenses incurred for attending such meetings at the rates provided under W.S.

9-3-102

and

9-3-103

.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 55, § 1; 2010, ch. 106, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

in (a) and (b), inserted “participating school districts” or similar language; and in (a), inserted “if there are less than five (5) participating school districts or no more than twelve (12) members if there are at least five (5) participating school districts,” and added the present last sentence.

Laws 2010, ch. 106, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2010.

§ 9-3-218.
Retiree membership in plan.

A retiree is eligible for coverage under the group insurance plan at premium rates established by the department, provided:

Application to continue coverage is made to the department within thirty-one (31) days after termination of the retiree’s employment;

The retiree has had medical coverage in effect under the group insurance plan for at least one (1) year immediately prior to the date of retirement and is eligible to receive a retirement benefit under the Wyoming retirement system; and either:

Has attained the age of fifty (50) on the date of retirement and has at least four (4) years of service credit under the Wyoming retirement system as an employee of one (1) of the employing entities participating in the plan; or

Has at least twenty (20) years of service credit under the Wyoming retirement system as an employee of one (1) of the employing entities participating in the plan.

Within the application period provided under paragraph (a)(i) of this section, the retiree may elect to continue coverage of his eligible dependents under the group insurance plan provided each such dependent was covered under the group insurance plan for at least one (1) year immediately prior to the retiree’s date of retirement. An election to add dependents may not be made after the initial application period unless the increase in the number of dependents results from a subsequent marriage, birth or adoption in which case the dependents may be enrolled at a later date upon conditions the department may impose.

The department shall establish procedures by which the eligible retiree shall make application within the thirty-one (31) day period provided under paragraph (a)(i) of this section.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 102, § 1.

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 323, effective July 1, 2004, directs the joint appropriations interim committee to conduct a study of the state employees' and officials' insurance program for retired employees, which is to include a study of the costs of the program for retirees including the consideration of other benefits available to retirees, alternatives for providing insurance for retired employees including health care savings accounts and a catastrophic coverage program, and alternatives for state contributions to retirees' insurance and the costs associated with those alternatives. State agencies must provide data and information as required by the committee to perform the study. The committee is to report its findings and recommendations to the legislature not later than December 1, 2004.

Prospective application. —

Laws 2001, ch. 102, § 3, provides: “Nothing in this act shall affect the eligibility of retirees currently participating in the group health insurance plan.”

§ 9-3-219.
Air ambulance transport services for employees, officials and dependents; reimbursement; sunset.

Emergency and medically necessary air ambulance transport services for employees, officials and their dependents shall be covered under W.S.

42-4-123

, subject to availability and any limitations specified by the department of health under W.S.

42-4-123

(a) and subject to operation of the air ambulance transport services program under W.S. 42-4-123(b).

Contingent on operation of the air ambulance transport services program under W.S.

42-4-123

(b), the department of administration and information shall pay reimbursement for services under this section to the department of health, as specified under W.S.

42-4-123

.

This section is repealed effective July 1, 2023.

History.

2019 ch. 189, § 2, effective April 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 22, § 1, effective March 9, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

in (a), added “and subject to operation of the air ambulance transport services program under W.S. 42-4-123(b)” at the end; and in (b), added “Contingent on operation of the air ambulance transport services program under W.S. 42-4-123(b)” at the beginning.

Laws 2020, ch. 22, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2020.

Effective date.—

Laws 2019, ch. 189 § 7, makes the act effective April 1, 2020.

Applicability.—

Laws 2019, ch. 189 § 6, provides: "This act applies to air ambulance transport services provided on or after April 1, 2020."